Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5560.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 18a. This act does not apply to earned wage access services that are offered or provided in accordance with the earned wage access services act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5558 (request no. H04676'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.